Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-13] Appeals. (a) Any
applicant or policyholder adversely affected by a decision of the fund shall
have the right to appeal to the fund's board within thirty days after the
decision. The application for an appeal shall specify how the person making
the appeal was aggrieved and the grounds upon which relief is demanded. The
decision of the board shall be deemed final.

(b) Any final action, decision, or order of
the board under this chapter shall be subject to judicial review by the circuit
court. [L 1993, c 339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next